Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 2. Board of Directors

§ 2831.
Membership; vacancies.

The Corporation shall be governed and all of its powers exercised by a Board of Directors consisting of 11 members. The Governor shall appoint five members as follows: one person to be the financial aid officer of an institution of postsecondary education in the State of Vermont; one person to be a guidance counselor from a Vermont secondary school; and three members representing the general public. In making the appointments of the members representing the general public, the Governor shall give due consideration to the Board’s needs for expertise and experience in the management of a financial institution. The State Treasurer or his or her designee shall be a member. The Speaker of the Vermont House of Representatives and the Committee on Committees of the Vermont Senate shall each appoint one member from their respective legislative bodies to serve on the Board. The Board shall elect three additional members. All members shall be of full age, citizens of the United States, and residents of Vermont. All appointments shall be for terms of six years with the exception of legislative members whose terms shall expire at the end of six years or when their service in the Vermont General Assembly is completed, whichever shall first occur. The date of the expiration of the term of appointment in each case shall be June 30. Vacancies that may occur by reason of death or resignation shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 4(a), (b), (i); amended

1967, No. 131

, § 2;

1989, No. 283

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2011, No. 40

, § 54, eff. May 20, 2011;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 100.

§ 2832.
Organization and compensation.

The Board, with the advice and consent of the Governor, shall elect from its members a chair. The Board shall also elect from its members a vice chair and secretary. Each of the officers shall hold office for two years and shall be eligible for reelection.

The Board shall serve without compensation except for expenses actually and necessarily incurred by them in the performance of their duties under this chapter.

The Board shall adopt bylaws for the Corporation and may appoint a president and determine the president’s compensation and duties. The Chair annually shall notify the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate of the president’s compensation.

The Board may elect an executive committee to serve in the interval between meetings to transact such business of the Corporation as provided in the bylaws.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 4(c), (d), (f), (g); amended

1967, No. 131

, § 3;

1989, No. 283

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 185, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 2833.
Meetings; quorum.

The Board shall hold regular meetings and such special meetings as it deems necessary. A majority of the directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business unless the bylaws of the Corporation require a larger number.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 4(e); amended

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 2834.
Powers and duties.

The Board has the power to adopt rules, regulations, policies, and procedures not inconsistent with law, governing the application for and the origination, servicing, and repayment of loans, the awarding of grants to students, and the Corporation’s other activities and programs.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 4(h), (j); amended

1967, No. 131

, § 4;

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2013, No. 56

, § 15, eff. May 30, 2013.

§ 2835.
Controls, audits, and reports.

Control of funds appropriated and all procedures incident to the carrying out of the purposes of this chapter shall be vested in the Board.

The books of account of the Corporation shall be audited annually by an independent public accounting firm registered in the State of Vermont in accordance with government auditing standards issued by the U.S. Government Accountability Office (GAO) and the resulting audit report filed with the Secretary of Administration not later than November 1 each year.

Biennially, the Board shall report to the General Assembly on its activities during the preceding biennium. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 8; amended

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2007, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 29;

2019, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.